dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/sakawA___tam">
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawIM</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawIM</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawIM</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/sakawA___tam">
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_sakawA_</l><r>0_sakawA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA</l><r>0_sakawA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/sakawA_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>sakawIM_WIM</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawIM_WIM</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawIM_WIM</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI_WI</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI_WI</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawI_WI</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe_We</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe_We</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawe_We</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA_WA</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA_WA</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>sakawA_WA</l><r>0_sakawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/0__tam">
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KA</l><r>_0<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/xenA_padA__tam">
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>0_xenA_padA</l><r>0_xenA_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ho</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hUz</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ho</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hUz</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/cAhiye__tam">
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/cAhiye_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="0_sakawA_"><i></i><par n="/sakawA___tam"/></e>
<e lm="0_sakawA_"><i></i><par n="/sakawA___tam"/></e>
<e lm="0_sakawA_WA"><i></i><par n="/sakawA_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="_0"><i></i><par n="/0__tam"/></e>
<e lm="0_xenA_padA"><i></i><par n="/xenA_padA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_cAhiye"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_cAhiye_WA"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_cAhiye"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_cAhiye_WA"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="wA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="wA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_cAhiye_WA"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__tam"/></e>
